Illinois, session 104th, SB1293.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 is 5amended by changing Sections 107-9 and 109-2 as follows: 6    (725 ILCS 5/107-9)  (from Ch. 38, par. 107-9)7    Sec. 107-9. Issuance of arrest warrant upon complaint. 8    (a) When a complaint is presented to a court charging that 9an offense has been committed, it shall examine upon oath or 10affirmation the complainant or any witnesses.11    (b) The complaint shall be in writing and shall:12        (1) State the name of the accused if known, and if not 13    known the accused may be designated by any name or 14    description by which he can be identified with reasonable 15    certainty;16        (2) State the offense with which the accused is 17    charged;18        (3) State the time and place of the offense as 19    definitely as can be done by the complainant; and20        (4) Be subscribed and sworn to by the complainant.21    (b-5) If an arrest warrant or summons is sought and the 22request is made by electronic means that has a simultaneous 23video and audio transmission between the requester and a   SB1293- 2 -LRB104 08831 RLC 18886 b1judge, the judge may issue an arrest warrant or summons based 2upon a sworn complaint or sworn testimony communicated in the 3transmission. 4    (c) A warrant or summons may be issued by the court for the 5arrest or appearance of the person complained against if it 6appears from the contents of the complaint and the examination 7of the complainant or other witnesses, if any, that the person 8against whom the complaint was made has committed an offense.9    (d) The warrant of arrest or summons shall:10        (1) Be in writing;11        (2) Specify the name, sex and birth date of the person 12    to be arrested or summoned or, if his name, sex or birth 13    date is unknown, shall designate such person by any name 14    or description by which the person can be identified with 15    reasonable certainty;16        (3) Set forth the nature of the offense;17        (4) State the date when issued and the municipality or 18    county where issued;19        (5) Be signed by the judge of the court with the title 20    of the judge's office; and 21        (6) Command that the person against whom the complaint 22    was made to be arrested and brought before the court 23    issuing the warrant at a certain day, time, and courtroom 24    number, or the nearest or most accessible court in the 25    same county, or appear before the court at a certain time 26    and place;  SB1293- 3 -LRB104 08831 RLC 18886 b1        (7) Specify the conditions of pretrial release, if 2    any; and3        (8) Specify any geographical limitation placed on the 4    execution of the warrant, if any, but such limitation 5    shall not be expressed in mileage.6    (e) The summons may be served in the same manner as the 7summons in a civil action, except that a police officer may 8serve a summons for a violation of an ordinance occurring 9within the municipality of the police officer.10    (f) If the person summoned fails to appear by the date 11required or cannot be located to serve the summons, a warrant 12may be issued by the court for the arrest of the person 13complained against.14    (g) A warrant of arrest issued under this Section shall 15incorporate the information included in the summons, and shall 16comply with the following:17        (1) The arrest warrant shall specify any geographic 18    limitation placed on the execution of the warrant, but 19    such limitation shall not be expressed in mileage. 20        (2) The arrest warrant shall be directed to all peace 21    officers in the State. It shall be executed by the peace 22    officer, or by a private person specially named therein, 23    at any location within the geographic limitation for 24    execution placed on the warrant. If no geographic 25    limitation is placed on the warrant, then it may be 26    executed anywhere in the State.  SB1293- 4 -LRB104 08831 RLC 18886 b1    (h) The arrest warrant or summons may be issued 2electronically or electromagnetically by use of electronic 3mail or a facsimile transmission machine and any such arrest 4warrant or summons shall have the same validity as a written 5arrest warrant or summons.6(Source: P.A. 101-239, eff. 1-1-20; 101-652, eff. 1-1-23; 7102-1104, eff. 1-1-23.) 8    (725 ILCS 5/109-2)  (from Ch. 38, par. 109-2)9    Sec. 109-2. Person arrested in another county. 10    (a) Any person arrested in a county other than the one in 11which a warrant for his arrest was issued shall be taken 12without unnecessary delay before the nearest and most 13accessible judge in the county where the arrest was made or, if 14no additional delay is created, before the nearest and most 15accessible judge in the county from which the warrant was 16issued. The judge may hold a hearing to determine if the 17defendant is the same person as named in the warrant.18    (b) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a), any 19person arrested in a county other than the one in which a 20warrant for his arrest was issued, may waive the right to be 21taken before a judge in the county where the arrest was made. 22If a person so arrested waives such right, the arresting 23agency shall surrender such person to a law enforcement agency 24of the county that issued the warrant without unnecessary 25delay. The provisions of Section 109-1 shall then apply to the   SB1293- 5 -LRB104 08831 RLC 18886 b1person so arrested.2    (c) If a person is taken before a judge in any county and a 3warrant for arrest issued by another Illinois county exists 4for that person, the court in the arresting county shall hold 5for that person a detention hearing under Section 110-6.1, or 6other hearing under Section 110-5 or Section 110-6. 7    (d) After the court in the arresting county has determined 8whether the person shall be released or detained on the 9arresting offense, the court shall then order the sheriff to 10immediately contact the sheriff in any county where any 11warrant is outstanding and notify them of the arrest of the 12individual. 13    (e) If a person has a warrant in another county for an 14offense, then, no later than 5 calendar days after the end of 15any detention issued on the charge in the arresting county, 16the county where the warrant is outstanding shall do one of the 17following: 18        (1) transport the person to the county where the 19    warrant was issued for a hearing under Section 110-6 or 20    110-6.1 in the matter for which the warrant was issued; or21        (2) mark quash the warrant as served and order the 22    person released on the case for which the warrant was 23    issued only when the county that issued the warrant fails 24    to transport the defendant in the timeline as proscribed. 25    (f) If the issuing county fails to take any action under 26subsection (e) within 5 calendar days, the defendant shall be   SB1293- 6 -LRB104 08831 RLC 18886 b1released from custody on the warrant, and the circuit judge or 2associate circuit judge in the county of arrest shall set 3conditions of release under Section 110-5 and shall admit the 4defendant to pretrial release and shall schedule for his or 5her appearance before the court named in the warrant based 6upon the court day, time, and courtroom number listed on the 7warrant. Upon releasing the defendant, the circuit judge or 8associate circuit judge shall certify such a fact on the 9warrant and deliver the warrant and the acknowledgment by the 10defendant of his or her receiving the conditions of pretrial 11release to the officer having charge of the defendant from 12arrest and without delay deliver such warrant and such 13acknowledgment by the defendant of his or her receiving the 14conditions to the court before which the defendant is required 15to appear. 16    (g) If a person has a warrant in another county, in lieu of 17transporting the person to the issuing county as outlined in 18subsection (e), the issuing county may hold the hearing by way 19of a two-way audio-visual communication system if the accused 20waives the right to be physically present in court, the court 21determines that the physical health and safety of any person 22necessary to the proceedings would be endangered by appearing 23in court, or the chief judge of the circuit orders use of that 24system due to operational challenges in conducting the hearing 25in person. Such operational challenges must be documented and 26approved by the chief judge of the circuit, and a plan to   SB1293- 7 -LRB104 08831 RLC 18886 b1address the challenges through reasonable efforts must be 2presented and approved by the Administrative Office of the 3Illinois Courts every 6 months. 4    (h) If more than 2 Illinois county warrants exist, the 5judge in the county of arrest shall order that the process 6described in subsections (d) through (f) occur in each county 7in whatever order the judge finds most appropriate. Each judge 8in each subsequent county shall then follow the rules in this 9Section. 10    (i) This Section applies only to warrants issued by 11Illinois state, county, or municipal courts. 12    (j) When an issuing agency is contacted by an out-of-state 13agency of a person arrested for any offense, or when an 14arresting agency is contacted by or contacts an out-of-state 15issuing agency, the Uniform Criminal Extradition Act shall 16govern. 17(Source: P.A. 101-652, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1104, eff. 1-1-23.)